District of Columbia statutes.
31-3515

Conversion to a for-profit entity.

A corporation issued a certificate of authority under this chapter shall not be converted into a stock corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other business entity organized for profit.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-245, § 16, 44 DCR 1158
Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 401(c), 50 DCR 330
Dec. 9, 2003, D.C. Law 15-56, § 3(a), 50 DCR 9188
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-369, § 2(g), 56 DCR 1346
1981 Ed., § 35-4715.
D.C. Law 14-297 rewrote subsec. (b)(2) which had read as follows: “(2) Fails to comply with §§ 31-4405, 31-4410 through 31-4415, 31-4421, 31-4424, 31-4428, 31-4431, and 31-4441;”
D.C. Law 15-56, in subsec. (b), substituted “company not involving a nonprofit hospital service plan or medical service plan unless” for “company unless”, and added subsec. (b-1).
D.C. Law 17-369 rewrote the section.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation Merger Review Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-217, March 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2730).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation Merger Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-457, July 23, 2002, 48 DCR 8132).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation Merger Review Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-513, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10475).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation Merger Review Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-8, January 27, 2003, 50 DCR 1473).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation Merger Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-205, October 24, 2003, 50 DCR 9845).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(a) of Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation Merger Review Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-257, November 25, 2003, 50 DCR 11006).